Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska90-401
Game and Parks Commission; Red Willow and Strunk Lake State Recreation Areas; construct campgrounds and other recreation developments.

The Game and Parks Commission is hereby authorized to construct campgrounds and other recreation developments at Red Willow State Recreation Area and Strunk Lake State Recreation Area pursuant to the 1978 Strunk Lake State Recreation Area and Red Willow State Recreation Area Development Program prepared by such commission.

Laws 1978, LB 108, § 1.